District of Columbia statutes.
35-261

Notice of enhanced penalties for commission of offenses against transit operators and Metrorail station managers.

(a)

(1)

The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority shall post or otherwise provide conspicuous notice of the enhanced penalties for the commission of certain offenses against transit operators and Metrorail station managers in the District of Columbia pursuant to § 22-3751.01 on all Metrobus buses and Metrorail trains operating in the District of Columbia, and at or near all Metrorail station kiosks within the District of Columbia.

(2)

The Mayor shall post or otherwise provide similar notice on all DC Circulator buses.

(b)

The absence of notice on a vehicle or at a Metrorail station required under this section shall not constitute a defense to or otherwise invalidate or prevent the imposition of the enhanced penalties provided in § 22-3751.01.

July 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-206, § 4, 55 DCR 5168